Utah statutes.
31A-19a-213.   Joint underwriting.
Notwithstanding Subsection 31A-19a-306(2)(a), insurers participating in joint
underwriting associations or joint reinsurance pursuant to Section 31A-20-102
or other arrangements for risk sharing may in connection with such activity
act in cooperation with each other in the making of one or more of the
following:
(1)  rates;
(2)  rating systems;
(3)  policy forms;
(4)  underwriting rules;
(5)  surveys;
(6)  inspections and investigations;
(7)  the furnishing of loss and expense statistics or other information; or
(8)  research.
